North Carolina, session 2025, SB951.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of twenty million four hundred forty thousand dollars
($20,440,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to
the Town of Davidson for emergency services. These funds shall be used as follows:
(1) Seventeen million dollars ($17,000,000) for the construction of a fire station.
(2) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) to purchase an emergency vehicle.
(3) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to purchase police equipment to
enhance community safety.
(4) Three hundred forty thousand dollars ($340,000) to replace breathing
apparatus equipment.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of Cornelius for the following
purposes and in the following amounts:
(1) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) for the acquisition of property for the
construction of a future public safety facility, including a future fire station
that will provide for emergency services for the southwest portion of the Town
and space for a police facility to augment current police space.
(2) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) for the replacement
of a fire engine.
(3) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) to improve pedestrian safety at the
intersection of NC 115 and Catawba Avenue to accommodate increased
pedestrian activity in the downtown Cornelius area.
(4) Three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) to construct a
recreation center on the campus of an elementary school in the Town.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Lake Norman Community
Development Corporation (Corporation), a nonprofit corporation, for the purposes and in the
amounts provided in this section. The Corporation may retain and use up to three percent (3%)
of the funds appropriated in this section for administrative expenses.
(1) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for the development of affordable housing
throughout the Town of Cornelius, other than in the Smithville community.
*S951-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for the acquisition of land and the
development of affordable housing in the Smithville community located in the
Town of Cornelius.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 Senate Bill 951-First Edition